Washington statutes.
RCW 7.56.070

Judgment for relator—Ouster of defendant.

If judgment be rendered in favor of the relator, he or she shall proceed to exercise the functions of the office, after he or she has been qualified as required by law, and the court shall order the defendant to deliver over all books and papers in his or her custody or within his or her power, belonging to the office from which he or she has been ousted.

[ 2011 c 336 s 240; Code 1881 s 708; 1877 p 144 s 712; 1854 p 217 s 474; RRS s 1040.]